nl: Compatibele gordeloproller: Beide/universeel; Niet-oprolbaar (statisch); Oprolbaar (ELR/ALR); Overige
nb: Kompatibel stropptrekker: Begge/universell; Ikke-inntrekkbar (statisk); Inntrekkbar (ELR/ALR); Annet
ro-RO: Retractor de curea compatibil: Ambele/universal; Neretractabil (static); Retractabil (ELR/ALR); Altele
it: Retrattore per cinturino compatibile: Entrambi/Universale; Non retrattile (statico); Retrattile (ELR/ALR); Altro
sl-SI: Združljiv navijalec traku: Oboje/univerzalno; Nezložljivo (statično); Zložljivo (ELR/ALR); Drugo
sv: Kompatibel remindragare: Båda/universell; Ej rullbar (statisk); Rullbar (ELR/ALR); Övrigt
zh-TW: 相容束帶捲收器: 兩者皆有/通用; 不可伸縮 (靜態); 可伸縮 (ELR/ALR); 其他
ru: Совместимый втягивающий механизм ремня: Оба / универсальный; Невтягивающийся (статический); Втягивающийся (ELR/ALR); Другое
hu: Kompatibilis heveder-visszahúzó: Mindkettő/univerzális; Nem visszahúzódó (statikus); Visszahúzódó (ELR/ALR); Egyéb
zh-CN: 适配肩带收缩器: 两者皆有/通用; 非卷收式（静态）; 卷收式 (ELR/ALR); 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamas diržo įtraukiklis: Abu / universalus; Neįtraukiamas (statinis); Įtraukiamas (ELR / ALR); Kita
ko: 호환 스트랩 리트랙터: 모두/범용; 고정식(스태틱); 자동 감김식(ELR/ALR); 기타
pt-PT: Afastador de pega compatível: Ambos/universal; Não retrátil (estático); Retrátil (ELR/ALR); Outro
el: Συμβατός μηχανισμός επαδίπλωσης ιμάντα: Και τα δύο/Γενικής χρήσης; Μη ανασυρόμενο (στατικό); Ανασυρόμενο (ELR/ALR); Άλλο
de: Kompatibler Gurtaufroller: Beide/Universal; Nicht aufrollbar (statisch); Aufrollbar (ELR/ALR); Sonstige
hr-HR: Kompatibilni retraktor remena: Oboje / univerzalno; Bez uvlačenja (statički); S uvlačenjem (ELR/ALR); Ostalo
pl: Kompatybilny zwijacz pasa: Oba/Uniwersalne; Niezijane (statyczne); Zwijane (ELR/ALR); Inne
fi: Yhteensopiva vyönkelauslaite: Molemmat/universaali; Kiinteä (ei sisäänkelautuva); Sisäänkelautuva (ELR/ALR); Muu
th: ตัวดึงสายรัดที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ทั้งสองแบบ/อเนกประสงค์; ไม่ดึงกลับ (คงที่); ดึงกลับ (ELR/ALR); อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Kompatibilný navíjač popruhov: Oboje/univerzálny; Nenavíjací (statický); Navíjací (ELR/ALR); Iné
tr: Uyumlu kayış geri çekme mekanizması: Her ikisi/evrensel; Geri sarılmaz (statik); Geri sarmalı (ELR/ALR); Diğer
ja: 互換性のあるストラップリトラクター: 両方/ユニバーサル; 巻き取りなし (静的); 巻き取り式 (ELR/ALR); その他
vi: Bộ thu dây đai tương thích: Cả hai/Đa năng; Không tự cuộn (tĩnh); Tự cuộn (ELR/ALR); Khác
en: Compatible strap retractor: Both/Universal; Non-retractable (static); Retractable (ELR/ALR); Other
cs: Kompatibilní navíječ popruhů: Oba/univerzální; Nenavíjecí (statické); Navíjecí (ELR/ALR); Jiné
fr: Rétracteur de sangle compatible: Les deux/universel; Non rétractable (statique); Rétractable (ELR/ALR); Autre
pt-BR: Retrator de correia compatível: Ambos/Universal; Não retrátil (estático); Retrátil (ELR/ALR); Outro
da: Kompatibel remoptrækker: Begge/universal; Ikke-oprullelig (statisk); Oprullelig (ELR/ALR); Andet
es: Retractor de correa compatible: Ambos/universal; No retráctil (estático); Retráctil (ELR/ALR); Otro
bg-BG: Съвместим механизъм за прибиране на колан: И двете/универсален; Без прибиране (статичен); С прибиране (ELR/ALR); Друг